New York, session 2025-2026, A8444.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The administrative code of the city of New York is amended 2 by adding a new section 13-157.5 to read as follows: 3 § 13-157.5 Twenty-two and one-half year retirement program for EMT 4 members. a. Definitions. The following words and phrases as used in 5 this section shall have the following meanings unless a different mean- 6 ing is plainly required by the context. 7 1. "EMT member" shall mean (i) a member of the retirement system who 8 is employed by the city of New York or by the New York city health and 9 hospitals corporation in a title whose duties are those of an emergency 10 medical technician or advanced emergency medical technician, as those 11 terms are defined in section three thousand one of the public health 12 law, and (ii) a member of the retirement system who, on the effective 13 date of this section or thereafter, was employed by the city of New York 14 or by the New York city health and hospitals corporation in a title 15 whose duties are those of an emergency medical technician or advanced 16 emergency medical technician, as those terms are defined in section EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00483-05-6 A. 8444--A 2 1 three thousand one of the public health law and who, subsequent thereto, 2 became employed by the city of New York or by the New York city health 3 and hospitals corporation in a title whose duties require the super- 4 vision of employees whose duties are those of an emergency medical tech- 5 nician or advanced emergency medical technician, as those terms are 6 defined in section three thousand one of the public health law. 7 2. "Twenty-two and one-half year retirement program" shall mean all 8 the terms and conditions of this section. 9 3. "Starting date of the twenty-two and one-half year retirement 10 program" shall mean the effective date of this section, as such date is 11 certified pursuant to section forty-one of the legislative law. 12 4. "Participant in the twenty-two and one-half year retirement 13 program" shall mean any EMT member who, under the applicable provisions 14 of subdivision b of this section, is entitled to the rights, benefits 15 and privileges and is subject to the obligations of the twenty-two and 16 one-half year retirement program as applicable to such member. 17 5. "Discontinued member" shall mean a participant in the twenty-two 18 one-half year retirement program who, while they were an EMT member, 19 discontinued service as such a member and has a right to a deferred 20 vested benefit under the provisions of subdivision d of this section. 21 6. "Creditable city service" for purposes of this section shall mean 22 (i) all service while employed by the city of New York or by the New 23 York city health and hospitals corporation in a title whose duties are 24 those of an emergency medical technician or advanced emergency medical 25 technician, as those terms are defined in section three thousand one of 26 the public health law; and (ii) with respect to an individual who was 27 employed on the effective date of this section in a title whose duties 28 are those of an emergency medical technician or advanced emergency 29 medical technician, as those terms are defined in section three thousand 30 one of the public health law, all such service subsequent thereto in a 31 title whose duties require the supervision of employees whose duties are 32 those of an emergency medical technician or advanced emergency medical 33 technician, as those terms are defined in section three thousand one of 34 the public health law; and (iii) all service while employed by the city 35 of New York or by the New York city health and hospitals corporation in 36 the title motor vehicle operator. 37 b. Participation in twenty-two and one-half year retirement program. 38 1. Subject to the provisions of paragraphs five and six of this subdivi- 39 sion, any person who is an EMT member on the starting date of the twen- 40 ty-two and one-half year retirement program may elect to become a 41 participant in the twenty-two and one-half year retirement program by 42 filing, within one hundred eighty days after the starting date of the 43 twenty-two and one-half year retirement program, a duly executed appli- 44 cation for such participation with the retirement system of which such 45 person is a member, provided such person is such an EMT member on the 46 date such application is filed. 47 2. Subject to the provisions of paragraphs five and six of this subdi- 48 vision, any person who becomes an EMT member after the starting date of 49 the twenty-two and one-half year retirement program may elect to become 50 a participant in the twenty-two and one-half year retirement program by 51 filing, within one hundred eighty days after becoming such an EMT 52 member, a duly executed application for such participation with the 53 retirement system of which such person is a member, provided such person 54 is such an EMT member on the date such application is filed. 55 3. Any election to be a participant in the twenty-two and one-half 56 year retirement program shall be irrevocable. A. 8444--A 3 1 4. Where any participant in the twenty-two and one-half year retire- 2 ment program shall cease to be employed as an EMT member, they shall 3 cease to be such a participant and, during any period in which such 4 person is not so employed, they shall not be a participant in the twen- 5 ty-two and one-half year retirement program and shall not be eligible 6 for the benefits of subdivision c of this section. 7 5. Where any participant in the twenty-two and one-half year retire- 8 ment program terminates service as an EMT member and returns to such 9 service as an EMT member at a later date, they shall again become such a 10 participant on that date. 11 6. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any 12 person who is eligible to become a participant in the twenty-two and 13 one-half year retirement program pursuant to paragraph one or two of 14 this subdivision for the full one hundred eighty day period provided for 15 in such applicable paragraph and who fails to timely file a duly 16 executed application for such participation with the retirement system, 17 shall not thereafter be eligible to become a participant in such 18 program. 19 c. Service retirement benefits. 1. A participant in the twenty-two and 20 one-half year retirement program: 21 (i) who has completed twenty-two and one-half or more years of credit- 22 able city service; and 23 (ii) who files with the retirement system an application for service 24 retirement setting forth at what time, not less than thirty days subse- 25 quent to the execution and filing thereof, such participant desires to 26 be retired; and 27 (iii) who shall be a participant in the twenty-two and one-half year 28 retirement program at the time so specified for such participant's 29 retirement; shall be retired pursuant to the provisions of this section 30 affording early service retirement. 31 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the 32 early service retirement benefit for a participant in the twenty-two and 33 one-half year retirement program who retires pursuant to paragraph one 34 of this subdivision shall be a retirement allowance consisting of: 35 (i) an amount, on account of the required minimum period of service, 36 equal to the sums of (A) an annuity which shall be the actuarial equiv- 37 alent of the accumulated deductions from such participant's pay during 38 such period, (B) a pension for increased-take-home-pay which shall be 39 the actuarial equivalent of the reserve-for-increased-take-home-pay to 40 which such participant may be entitled for such period, and (C) a 41 pension which, when added to such annuity and such pension for 42 increased-take-home-pay, produces a retirement allowance equal to 43 fifty-five percent of the salary earned or earnable in the year prior to 44 their retirement; plus 45 (ii) an amount for each additional year of creditable city service, or 46 fraction thereof, beyond such required minimum period of service equal 47 to one and seven-tenths percent of the final average salary for such 48 creditable service during the period from the completion of twenty-two 49 and one-half years of creditable city service to the date of retirement. 50 d. Vesting. 1. A participant in the twenty-two and one-half year 51 retirement program who: 52 (i) discontinues service as an EMT member, other than by death or 53 retirement; and 54 (ii) prior to such discontinuance, completed five but less than twen- 55 ty-two years of creditable city service; and A. 8444--A 4 1 (iii) does not withdraw in whole or in part such participant's accumu- 2 lated member contributions pursuant to section 13-141 of this chapter, 3 shall be entitled to receive a deferred vested benefit as provided in 4 this subdivision. 5 2. (i) Upon such discontinuance under the conditions and in compliance 6 with the provisions of paragraph one of this subdivision, such deferred 7 vested benefit shall vest automatically. 8 (ii) Such vested benefit shall become payable on the earliest date on 9 which such discontinued member could have retired for service if such 10 discontinuance had not occurred. 11 3. Such deferred vested benefit shall be a retirement allowance 12 consisting of an amount equal to two and two-tenths percent of such 13 discontinued member's salary earned or earnable in the year prior to 14 such member's discontinuance, multiplied by the number of years of cred- 15 itable city service. 16 e. Member contributions. 1. All EMT members of the twenty-two and 17 one-half year retirement program shall be required to make member 18 contributions and additional member contributions in accordance with and 19 subject to the same rights, privileges, obligations and procedures as 20 govern the member contribution and additional member contributions 21 required by subdivision d of section four hundred forty-five-e of the 22 retirement and social security law. 23 2. For the purpose of applying under this subdivision, such subdivi- 24 sion d of section four hundred forty-five-e of the retirement and social 25 security law to an EMT member of the twenty-two and one-half year 26 retirement program who is subject to the provisions of this section, and 27 is not subject to the provisions of article eleven of the retirement and 28 social security law, the term "credited service", as used in such subdi- 29 vision, shall be deemed to mean creditable city service. 30 f. Cost-of-living adjustments. Notwithstanding any other provision of 31 law to the contrary, a person who retires with a retirement benefit 32 provided for in the twenty-two and one-half year retirement program 33 pursuant to the provisions of this section shall not be entitled to the 34 cost-of-living adjustments provided pursuant to section 13-696 of the 35 administrative code of the city of New York. 36 § 2. Subdivision a of section 444 of the retirement and social securi- 37 ty law, as amended by section 141 of subpart B of part C of chapter 62 38 of the laws of 2011, is amended to read as follows: 39 a. Except as provided in subdivision c of section four hundred forty- 40 five-a of this article, subdivision c of section four hundred forty- 41 five-b of this article, subdivision c of section four hundred forty- 42 five-c of this article, subdivision c of section four hundred 43 forty-five-d of this article as added by chapter four hundred seventy- 44 two of the laws of nineteen hundred ninety-five, subdivision c of 45 section four hundred forty-five-e of this article, subdivision c of 46 section four hundred forty-five-f of this article [and], subdivision c 47 of section four hundred forty-five-h of this article, and subdivision c 48 of section four hundred forty-five-j of this article, the maximum 49 retirement benefit computed without optional modification provided to a 50 member of a retirement system who is subject to the provisions of this 51 article, other than a police officer, a firefighter, an investigator 52 member of the New York city employees' retirement system, a member of 53 the uniformed personnel in institutions under the jurisdiction of the 54 New York city department of correction who receives a performance of 55 duty disability retirement allowance, a member of the uniformed person- 56 nel in institutions under the jurisdiction of the department of A. 8444--A 5 1 corrections and community supervision or a security hospital treatment 2 assistant, as those terms are defined in subdivision i of section eight- 3 y-nine of this chapter, who receives a performance of duty disability 4 retirement allowance, a member of a teachers' retirement system, New 5 York city employees' retirement system, New York city board of education 6 retirement system or a member of the New York state and local employees' 7 retirement system or a member of the New York city employees' retirement 8 system or New York city board of education retirement system employed as 9 a special officer, parking control specialist, school safety agent, 10 campus peace officer, taxi and limousine inspector or a police communi- 11 cations member and who receives a performance of duty disability 12 pension, from funds other than those based on a member's own or 13 increased-take-home-pay contributions, shall, before any reduction for 14 early retirement, be sixty per centum of the first fifteen thousand 15 three hundred dollars of final average salary, and fifty per centum of 16 final average salary in excess of fifteen thousand three hundred 17 dollars, and forty per centum of final average salary in excess of twen- 18 ty-seven thousand three hundred dollars, provided, however, that the 19 benefits provided by subdivision c of section four hundred forty-five-d 20 of this article as added by chapter four hundred seventy-two of the laws 21 of nineteen hundred ninety-five based upon the additional member 22 contributions required by subdivision d of such section four hundred 23 forty-five-d shall be subject to the maximum retirement benefit computa- 24 tions set forth in this section. The maximum retirement benefit computed 25 without optional modification payable to a police officer, an investi- 26 gator member of the New York city employees' retirement system or a 27 firefighter shall equal that payable upon completion of thirty years of 28 service, except that the maximum service retirement benefit computed 29 without optional modification shall equal that payable upon completion 30 of thirty-two years of service. 31 § 3. Subdivision a of section 445 of the retirement and social secu- 32 rity law, as amended by section 2 of part TT of chapter 55 of the laws 33 of 2025, is amended to read as follows: 34 a. No member of a retirement system who is subject to the provisions 35 of this article shall retire without regard to age, exclusive of retire- 36 ment for disability, unless they are a police officer, an investigator 37 member of the New York city employees' retirement system, firefighter, 38 correction officer, a qualifying member as defined in section eighty- 39 nine-t, as added by chapter six hundred fifty-seven of the laws of nine- 40 teen hundred ninety-eight, of this chapter, sanitation worker, a special 41 officer (including persons employed by the city of New York in the title 42 urban park ranger or associate urban park ranger), school safety agent, 43 campus peace officer or a taxi and limousine commission inspector member 44 of the New York city employees' retirement system or the New York city 45 board of education retirement system, a dispatcher member of the New 46 York city employees' retirement system, a police communications member 47 of the New York city employees' retirement system, an EMT member of the 48 New York city employees' retirement system, a deputy sheriff member of 49 the New York city employees' retirement system, a correction officer of 50 the Westchester county correction department as defined in section 51 eighty-nine-e of this chapter or employed in Suffolk county as a peace 52 officer, as defined in section eighty-nine-s, as added by chapter five 53 hundred eighty-eight of the laws of nineteen hundred ninety-seven, of 54 this chapter, employed in Suffolk county as a correction officer, as 55 defined in section eighty-nine-f of this chapter, or employed in Nassau 56 county as a correction officer, uniformed correction division personnel, A. 8444--A 6 1 sheriff, undersheriff or deputy sheriff, as defined in section eighty- 2 nine-g of this chapter, or employed in Nassau county as an ambulance 3 medical technician, an ambulance medical technician/supervisor or a 4 member who performs ambulance medical technician related services, or a 5 police medic, police medic supervisor or a member who performs police 6 medic related services, as defined in section eighty-nine-s, as amended 7 by chapter five hundred seventy-eight of the laws of nineteen hundred 8 ninety-eight, of this chapter, or employed in Nassau county as a peace 9 officer, as defined in section eighty-nine-s, as added by chapter five 10 hundred ninety-five of the laws of nineteen hundred ninety-seven, of 11 this chapter, or employed in Albany county as a sheriff, undersheriff, 12 deputy sheriff, correction officer or identification officer, as defined 13 in section eighty-nine-h of this chapter or is employed in St. Lawrence 14 county as a sheriff, undersheriff, deputy sheriff or correction officer, 15 as defined in section eighty-nine-i of this chapter or is employed in 16 Orleans county as a sheriff, undersheriff, deputy sheriff or correction 17 officer, as defined in section eighty-nine-l of this chapter or is 18 employed in Jefferson county as a sheriff, undersheriff, deputy sheriff 19 or correction officer, as defined in section eighty-nine-j of this chap- 20 ter or is employed in Onondaga county as a deputy sheriff-jail division 21 competitively appointed or as a correction officer, as defined in 22 section eighty-nine-k of this chapter or is employed in a county which 23 makes an election under subdivision j of section eighty-nine-p of this 24 chapter as a sheriff, undersheriff, deputy sheriff or correction officer 25 as defined in such section eighty-nine-p or is employed in Broome County 26 as a sheriff, undersheriff, deputy sheriff or correction officer, as 27 defined in section eighty-nine-m of this chapter or is a Monroe county 28 deputy sheriff-court security, or deputy sheriff-jailor as defined in 29 section eighty-nine-n, as added by chapter five hundred ninety-seven of 30 the laws of nineteen hundred ninety-one, of this chapter or is employed 31 in Greene county as a sheriff, undersheriff, deputy sheriff or 32 correction officer, as defined in section eighty-nine-o of this chapter 33 or is a traffic officer with the town of Elmira as defined in section 34 eighty-nine-q of this chapter or is employed by Suffolk county as a park 35 police officer, as defined in section eighty-nine-r of this chapter or 36 is a peace officer employed by a county probation department as defined 37 in section eighty-nine-t, as added by chapter six hundred three of the 38 laws of nineteen hundred ninety-eight, of this chapter or is employed in 39 Rockland county as a deputy sheriff-civil as defined in section eighty- 40 nine-v of this chapter as added by chapter four hundred forty-one of the 41 laws of two thousand one, or is employed in Rockland county as a superi- 42 or correction officer as defined in section eighty-nine-v of this chap- 43 ter as added by chapter five hundred fifty-six of the laws of two thou- 44 sand one or is a paramedic employed by the police department in the town 45 of Tonawanda and retires under the provisions of section eighty-nine-v 46 of this chapter, as added by chapter four hundred seventy-two of the 47 laws of two thousand one, or is a county fire marshal, supervising fire 48 marshal, fire marshal, assistant fire marshal, assistant chief fire 49 marshal, chief fire marshal, division supervising fire marshal or fire 50 marshal trainee employed by the county of Nassau as defined in section 51 eighty-nine-w of this chapter or is employed in Monroe county as a depu- 52 ty sheriff-civil as defined in section eighty-nine-x of this chapter, 53 employed as an emergency medical technician, critical care technician, 54 advanced emergency medical technician, paramedic or supervisor of such 55 titles in a participating Suffolk county fire district as defined in 56 section eighty-nine-ss of this chapter, or is a firefighter apprentice, A. 8444--A 7 1 airport firefighter I, airport firefighter II, airport firefighter III, 2 or training and safety officer employed by the division of military and 3 naval affairs as defined in section eighty-nine-y of this chapter and is 4 in a plan which permits immediate retirement upon completion of a speci- 5 fied period of service without regard to age. Except as provided in 6 subdivision c of section four hundred forty-five-a of this article, 7 subdivision c of section four hundred forty-five-b of this article, 8 subdivision c of section four hundred forty-five-c of this article, 9 subdivision c of section four hundred forty-five-d of this article, 10 subdivision c of section four hundred forty-five-e of this article, 11 subdivision c of section four hundred forty-five-f of this article 12 [and], subdivision c of section four hundred forty-five-h of this arti- 13 cle, and subdivision c of section four hundred forty-five-j of this 14 article, a member in such a plan and such an occupation, other than a 15 police officer or investigator member of the New York city employees' 16 retirement system or a firefighter, shall not be permitted to retire 17 prior to the completion of twenty-five years of credited service; 18 provided, however, if such a member in such an occupation is in a plan 19 which permits retirement upon completion of twenty years of service 20 regardless of age, they may retire upon completion of twenty years of 21 credited service and prior to the completion of twenty-five years of 22 service, but in such event the benefit provided from funds other than 23 those based on such a member's own contributions shall not exceed two 24 per centum of final average salary per each year of credited service. 25 § 4. The retirement and social security law is amended by adding a new 26 section 445-j to read as follows: 27 § 445-j. Optional twenty-two and one-half year improved benefit 28 retirement program for EMT members. a. Definitions. The following words 29 and phrases as used in this section shall have the following meanings 30 unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context. 31 1. "Retirement system" shall mean the New York city employees' retire- 32 ment system. 33 2. "EMT member" shall mean a member of the retirement system who is 34 subject to the provisions of this article, who is employed by the city 35 of New York or by the New York city health and hospitals corporation in 36 a title whose duties are those of an emergency medical technician or 37 advanced emergency medical technician, as those terms are defined in 38 section three thousand one of the public health law, or in a title whose 39 duties require the supervision of employees whose duties are those of an 40 emergency medical technician or advanced emergency medical technician, 41 as those terms are defined in section three thousand one of the public 42 health law. 43 3. "Twenty-two and one-half year improved benefit retirement program" 44 shall mean all the terms and conditions of this section. 45 4. "Starting date of the twenty-two and one-half year improved benefit 46 retirement program" shall mean the effective date of this section. 47 5. "Participant in the twenty-two and one-half year improved benefit 48 retirement program" shall mean any EMT member who, under the applicable 49 provisions of subdivision b of this section, is entitled to the rights, 50 benefits and privileges and is subject to the obligations of the twen- 51 ty-two and one-half year improved benefit retirement program, as appli- 52 cable to such member. 53 6. "Administrative code" shall mean the administrative code of the 54 city of New York. A. 8444--A 8 1 7. "Accumulated deductions" shall mean accumulated deductions as 2 defined in subdivision eleven of section 13-101 of the administrative 3 code. 4 8. "Optional retirement provisions" shall mean the right to retire and 5 receive a retirement allowance under this section upon the completion of 6 twenty-two and one-half years of creditable service as an EMT member. 7 9. "Creditable service as an EMT member" shall mean (i) all service as 8 an EMT member; and (ii) all service while employed by the city of New 9 York or by the New York city health and hospitals corporation in the 10 title motor vehicle operator. 11 b. Election of twenty-two and one-half year improved benefit retire- 12 ment program. 1. Subject to the provisions of paragraphs five and six 13 of this subdivision, any person who is an EMT member on the starting 14 date of the twenty-two and one-half year improved benefit retirement 15 program may elect to become a participant in the twenty-two and one-half 16 year improved benefit retirement program by filing, within one hundred 17 eighty days after such starting date, a duly executed application for 18 such participation with the retirement system, provided such person is 19 such an EMT member on the date such application is filed. 20 2. Subject to the provision of paragraphs five and six of this subdi- 21 vision, any person who becomes an EMT member after the starting date of 22 the twenty-two and one-half year improved benefit retirement program may 23 elect to become a participant in the twenty-two and one-half year 24 improved benefit retirement program by filing, within one hundred eighty 25 days after becoming such an EMT member, a duly executed application for 26 such participation with the retirement system, provided such person is 27 such an EMT member on the date such application is filed. 28 3. Any election to be a participant in the twenty-two and one-half 29 year improved benefit retirement program shall be irrevocable. 30 4. Where any participant in the twenty-two and one-half year improved 31 benefit retirement program shall cease to hold a position as an EMT 32 member, they shall cease to be such a participant and, during any period 33 in which such a person does not hold such an EMT position, they shall 34 not be a participant in the twenty-two and one-half year improved bene- 35 fit retirement program and shall not be eligible for the benefits of 36 subdivision c of this section. 37 5. Where any participant in the twenty-two and one-half year improved 38 benefit retirement program terminates service as an EMT member and 39 returns to such service as an EMT member at a later date, they shall 40 again become such a participant on that date. 41 6. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any 42 person who is eligible to become a participant in the twenty-two and 43 one-half year improved benefit retirement program pursuant to paragraph 44 one or two of this subdivision for the full one hundred eighty day peri- 45 od provided for in such applicable paragraph and who fails to timely 46 file a duly executed application for such participation with the retire- 47 ment system, shall not thereafter be eligible to become a participant in 48 such program. 49 c. Service retirement benefits. Notwithstanding any other provision of 50 law to the contrary, where a participant in the twenty-two and one-half 51 year improved benefit retirement program, who is otherwise qualified for 52 a retirement allowance pursuant to the optional retirement provision set 53 forth in subdivision a of this section, has made and/or paid, while such 54 participant is an EMT member, all additional member contributions and 55 interest, if any, required by subdivision d of this section, then: A. 8444--A 9 1 1. that participant, while they remain a participant, shall not be 2 subject to the provisions of subdivision a of section four hundred 3 forty-five of this article; and 4 2. if that participant, while such a participant, retires from 5 service, they shall not be subject to the provisions of section four 6 hundred forty-four of this article; and 7 3. their retirement allowance shall be an amount, on account of this 8 required minimum period of service, equal to the sum of (i) an annuity 9 which shall be the actuarial equivalent of the accumulated deductions 10 from their pay during such period, (ii) a pension for increased-take- 11 home-pay which shall be the actuarial equivalent of the reserve for 12 increased-take-home-pay to which such participant may be entitled, for 13 such period, and (iii) a pension which, when added to such annuity and 14 such pension for increased-take-home-pay, produces a retirement allow- 15 ance equal to fifty percent of such participant's final average salary, 16 plus an amount for each additional year of creditable service as an EMT 17 member, or fraction thereof, beyond such required minimum period of 18 service equal to two percent of their final average salary for such 19 creditable service as an EMT member during the period from completion of 20 twenty-two and one-half or more years of creditable service as an EMT 21 member to the date of retirement but not to exceed more than five years 22 of additional service as an EMT member. 23 d. Additional member contributions. 1. In addition to the member 24 contributions required pursuant to section 13-125 or section 13-162 of 25 the administrative code, each participant in the twenty-two and one-half 26 year improved benefit retirement program shall contribute, subject to 27 the applicable provisions of section 13-125.2 of the administrative 28 code, an additional six and one-half percent of their compensation 29 earned from all credited service, as a participant in the twenty-two and 30 one-half year improved benefit retirement program, rendered on and after 31 the starting date of the improved benefit retirement program, and all 32 creditable service as an EMT member after such person ceases to be a 33 participant, but before they again become a participant pursuant to 34 paragraph five of subdivision b of this section. A participant in the 35 twenty-two and one-half year improved benefit retirement program shall 36 contribute additional member contributions until the later of the date 37 as of which such participant is eligible to retire with at least twen- 38 ty-two and one-half or more years of creditable service as an EMT member 39 under such retirement program, or the first anniversary of the starting 40 date of the twenty-two and one-half year improved benefit retirement 41 program. The additional contributions required by this section shall be 42 in lieu of additional member contributions required by section four 43 hundred forty-five-d of this article, as added by chapter ninety-six of 44 the laws of nineteen hundred ninety-five, and shall be in lieu of addi- 45 tional member contributions required by section four hundred 46 forty-five-e of this article, as added by chapter five hundred seventy- 47 seven of the laws of two thousand, and no member paying additional 48 contributions pursuant to this section shall be required to pay addi- 49 tional contributions pursuant to such subdivision d of section four 50 hundred forty-five-d of this article or pursuant to such subdivision d 51 of section four hundred forty-five-e of this article. 52 2. Commencing with the first full payroll period after each person 53 becomes a participant in the twenty-two and one-half year improved bene- 54 fit retirement program, additional member contributions at the rate 55 specified in paragraph one of this subdivision shall be deducted, 56 subject to the applicable provisions of section 13-125.2 of the adminis- A. 8444--A 10 1 trative code, from the compensation of such participant on each and 2 every payroll of such participant for each and every payroll period for 3 which they are such a participant. 4 3. (i) Subject to the provisions of subparagraph (ii) of this para- 5 graph, where any additional member contributions required by paragraph 6 one of this subdivision are not paid by deductions from a participant's 7 compensation pursuant to paragraph two of this subdivision: 8 (A) that participant shall be charged with a contribution deficiency 9 consisting of such unpaid amounts, together with interest thereon, 10 compounded annually; and 11 (B) such interest on each amount of undeducted contributions shall 12 accrue from the end of the payroll period for which such amount would 13 have been deducted from compensation if such participant had been a 14 participant at the beginning of that payroll period and such deductions 15 had been required for such payroll period until such amount is paid to 16 the retirement system; and 17 (C) (1) interest on each such amount included in such participant's 18 contribution deficiency pursuant to this subparagraph shall be calcu- 19 lated as if such additional member contributions never had been paid by 20 such participant, and such interest shall accrue from the end of the 21 payroll period to which an amount of such additional member contribution 22 is attributable, compounded annually, until such amount is paid to the 23 retirement system; 24 (2) the rate of interest to be applied to each such amount during the 25 period for which interest accrues on that amount shall be equal to the 26 rate or rates of interest required by law to be used during that same 27 period to credit interest on the accumulated deductions of retirement 28 system members. 29 (ii) Except as provided in subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, no 30 interest shall be due on any unpaid additional contributions which are 31 not attributable to the period prior to the first full payroll period 32 referred to in paragraph two of this subdivision. 33 (iii) Should any person who, pursuant to paragraph seven of this 34 subdivision, has withdrawn any additional member contributions and any 35 interest paid thereon, again become a participant in the twenty-two and 36 one-half year improved benefit retirement program pursuant to paragraph 37 five of subdivision b of this section, an appropriate amount shall be 38 included in such participant's contribution deficiency, including inter- 39 est thereon as calculated pursuant to subparagraph (ii) of this para- 40 graph, for any credited service with respect to which such person 41 received a refund of additional member contributions, including any 42 amount of an unpaid loan balance deemed to have been returned to such 43 person pursuant to paragraph seven of this subdivision, as if such addi- 44 tional member contributions never had been paid. 45 4. The board of trustees of the retirement system may, consistent with 46 the provisions of this subdivision, promulgate regulations for the 47 payment of the additional member contributions required by this subdivi- 48 sion, and any interest thereon, by a participant in the twenty-two and 49 one-half year improved benefit retirement program, including the 50 deduction of such contributions, and any interest thereon, from such 51 participant's compensation. 52 5. Where a participant who is otherwise eligible for service retire- 53 ment pursuant to subdivision c of this section did not, prior to the 54 effective date of retirement, pay the entire amount of a contribution 55 deficiency chargeable to such participant pursuant to paragraph three of 56 this subdivision, or repay the entire amount of a loan of such partic- A. 8444--A 11 1 ipant's additional member contributions pursuant to paragraph eight of 2 this subdivision, including accrued interest on such loan, that partic- 3 ipant, nevertheless, shall be eligible to retire pursuant to subdivision 4 c of this section, provided, however, that where such participant is not 5 entitled to a refund of additional member contributions pursuant to 6 paragraph seven of this subdivision, such participant's service retire- 7 ment benefit calculated pursuant to the applicable provisions of subdi- 8 vision c of this section shall be reduced by a life annuity, calculated 9 in accordance with the method set forth in subdivision i of section six 10 hundred thirteen-b of this chapter, which is actuarially equivalent to: 11 (i) the amount of any unpaid contribution deficiency chargeable to 12 such member pursuant to paragraph three of this subdivision; plus 13 (ii) the amount of any unpaid balance of a loan of their additional 14 member contributions pursuant to paragraph eight of this subdivision, 15 including accrued interest on such loan. 16 6. Subject to the provisions of paragraph five of this subdivision, 17 where a participant has not paid in full any contribution deficiency 18 chargeable to such participant pursuant to paragraph three of this 19 subdivision, and a benefit, other than a refund of a member's accumu- 20 lated deductions or a refund of additional member contributions pursuant 21 to paragraph seven of this subdivision, becomes payable by the retire- 22 ment system to the participant or to their designated beneficiary or 23 estate, the actuarial equivalent of any such unpaid amount shall be 24 deducted from the benefit otherwise payable. 25 7. (i) All additional member contributions required by this subdivi- 26 sion, and any interest thereon, which are received by the retirement 27 system shall be paid into its contingent reserve fund and shall be the 28 property of the retirement system. Such additional member contributions, 29 and any interest thereon, shall not for any purpose be deemed to be 30 member contributions or accumulated deductions of a member of the 31 retirement system under section 13-125 or section 13-162 of the adminis- 32 trative code while they are a participant in the twenty-two and one-half 33 year improved benefit retirement program or otherwise. 34 (ii) Should a participant in the twenty-two and one-half year improved 35 benefit retirement program, who has rendered less than fifteen years of 36 credited service cease to hold a position as an EMT member for any 37 reason whatsoever, such participant's accumulated additional member 38 contributions made pursuant to this subdivision, together with any 39 interest thereon paid to the retirement system, which remain credited to 40 such participant's account may be withdrawn by such participant pursuant 41 to procedures promulgated in regulations of the board of trustees of the 42 retirement system, together with interest thereon at the rate of inter- 43 est required by law to be used to credit interest on the accumulated 44 deductions of retirement system members compounded annually. 45 (iii) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, (A) 46 no person shall be permitted to withdraw from the retirement system any 47 additional member contributions paid pursuant to this subdivision or any 48 interest paid thereon, except pursuant to and in accordance with the 49 preceding subparagraphs of this paragraph; and (B) no person, while they 50 are a participant in the twenty-two and one-half year improved benefit 51 retirement program, shall be permitted to withdraw any such additional 52 member contributions or any interest paid thereon pursuant to any of the 53 preceding subparagraphs of this paragraph or otherwise. 54 8. A participant in the twenty-two and one-half year improved benefit 55 retirement program shall be permitted to borrow from their additional 56 member contributions, including any interest paid thereon, which are A. 8444--A 12 1 credited to the additional contributions account established for such 2 participant in the contingent reserve fund of the retirement system. The 3 borrowing from such additional member contributions pursuant to this 4 paragraph shall be governed by the same rights, privileges, obligations 5 and procedures set forth in section six hundred thirteen-b of this chap- 6 ter which govern the borrowing by members subject to article fifteen of 7 this chapter of member contributions made pursuant to section six 8 hundred thirteen of this chapter. The board of trustees of the retire- 9 ment system may, consistent with the provisions of this subdivision, 10 promulgate regulations governing the borrowing of such additional member 11 contributions. 12 9. Wherever a person has an unpaid balance of a loan of such person's 13 additional member contributions pursuant to paragraph eight of this 14 subdivision at the time such person becomes entitled to a refund of 15 their additional member contributions pursuant to subparagraph (ii) of 16 paragraph seven of this subdivision, the amount of such unpaid loan 17 balance, including accrued interest, shall be deemed to have been 18 returned to such member, and the refund of such additional contributions 19 shall be the net amount of such contributions, together with interest 20 thereon in accordance with the provisions of such subparagraph. 21 10. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the 22 provisions of section one hundred thirty-eight-b of this chapter shall 23 not be applicable to the additional member contributions which are 24 required by this subdivision. 25 11. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the 26 additional member contributions which are required by this subdivision 27 shall not be reduced under any program for increased-take-home-pay. 28 e. The provisions of this section shall not be construed to provide 29 benefits to any participant in the twenty-two and one-half year improved 30 benefit retirement program which are greater than those which would be 31 received by a similarly situated member who is entitled to benefits 32 under the provisions of section 13-157.5 of the administrative code, but 33 who is not governed by the provisions of this article. 34 f. Cost-of-living adjustments. Notwithstanding any other provision of 35 law to the contrary, a person who retires with a retirement benefit 36 provided for in the twenty-two and one-half year retirement program 37 pursuant to the provisions of this section shall not be entitled to the 38 cost-of-living adjustments provided pursuant to section 13-696 of the 39 administrative code of the city of New York. 40 § 5. Paragraph 3 of subdivision b of section 604-e of the retirement 41 and social security law, as added by chapter 577 of the laws of 2000, is 42 amended to read as follows: 43 3. Each EMT member, other than an EMT member subject to paragraph one 44 or two of this subdivision, who [becomes] became subject to the 45 provisions of this article on or after the starting date of the twenty- 46 five year retirement program and prior to the starting date of the twen- 47 ty-two and one-half year retirement program provided for in section six 48 hundred four-k of this article shall [become] continue to be a partic- 49 ipant in the twenty-five year retirement program [on the date he or she 50 becomes such an EMT member], unless such person elects to become a 51 member of the twenty-two and one-half year retirement program in accord- 52 ance with the conditions and terms of such section six hundred four-k. 53 Provided, however, a person subject to this paragraph, and who has 54 exceeded age twenty-five upon employment as an EMT member, shall be 55 exempt from participation in the improved twenty-five year retirement 56 program if such person elects not to participate by filing a duly A. 8444--A 13 1 executed form with the retirement system within one hundred eighty days 2 of becoming an EMT member. 3 § 6. The retirement and social security law is amended by adding a new 4 section 604-k to read as follows: 5 § 604-k. Twenty-two and one-half year retirement program for EMT 6 members. a. Definitions. The following words and phrases as used in this 7 section shall have the following meanings unless a different meaning is 8 plainly required by the context. 9 1. "EMT member" shall mean a member of the New York city employees' 10 retirement system who is employed by the city of New York or by the New 11 York city health and hospitals corporation in a title whose duties are 12 those of an emergency medical technician or an advanced emergency 13 medical technician, as those terms are defined in section three thousand 14 one of the public health law, or in a title whose duties require the 15 supervision of employees whose duties are those of an emergency medical 16 technician or advanced emergency medical technician, as those terms are 17 defined in section three thousand one of the public health law. 18 2. "Twenty-two and one-half year retirement program" shall mean all 19 the terms and conditions of this section. 20 3. "Starting date of the twenty-two and one-half year retirement 21 program" shall mean the effective date of this section. 22 4. "Participant in the twenty-two and one-half year retirement 23 program" shall mean any EMT member who, under the applicable provisions 24 of subdivision b of this section, is entitled to the rights, benefits 25 and privileges and is subject to the obligations of the twenty-two and 26 one-half year retirement program, as applicable to such member. 27 5. "Discontinued member" shall mean a participant in the twenty-two 28 and one-half year retirement program who, while such participant was an 29 EMT member, discontinued service as such a member and has a right to a 30 deferred vested benefit under subdivision d of this section. 31 6. "Administrative code" shall mean the administrative code of the 32 city of New York. 33 7. "Creditable service as an EMT member" shall mean (i) all service as 34 an EMT member; and (ii) all service while employed by the city of New 35 York or by the New York city health and hospitals corporation in the 36 title motor vehicle operator. 37 b. Participation in the twenty-two and one-half year retirement 38 program. 1. Subject to the provisions of paragraphs six and seven of 39 this subdivision, any person who is an EMT member on the starting date 40 of the twenty-two and one-half year retirement program and who, as such 41 an EMT member or otherwise, last became subject to the provisions of 42 this article prior to such starting date, may elect to become a partic- 43 ipant in the twenty-two and one-half year retirement program by filing, 44 within one hundred eighty days after such starting date, a duly executed 45 application for such participation with the retirement system of which 46 such person is a member, provided such person is such an EMT member on 47 the date such application is filed. An EMT member who elects to become a 48 member of the twenty-two and one-half year retirement program pursuant 49 to this paragraph shall cease to be a member of the twenty-five year 50 retirement program provided for in section six hundred four-e of this 51 article, as added by chapter five hundred seventy-seven of the laws of 52 two thousand. 53 2. Subject to the provisions of paragraphs six and seven of this 54 subdivision, any person who becomes an EMT member after the starting 55 date of the twenty-two and one-half year retirement program and who, as 56 such an EMT member or otherwise, last became subject to the provisions A. 8444--A 14 1 of this article prior to such starting date, may elect to become a 2 participant in the twenty-two and one-half year retirement program by 3 filing, within one hundred eighty days after becoming such an EMT 4 member, a duly executed application for such participation with the 5 retirement system for which such person is a member, provided such 6 person is such an EMT member on the date such application is filed. An 7 EMT member who elects to become a member of the twenty-two and one-half 8 year retirement program pursuant to this paragraph shall cease to be a 9 member of the twenty-five year retirement program provided for in 10 section six hundred four-e of this article, as added by chapter five 11 hundred seventy-seven of the laws of two thousand. 12 3. Any election to be a participant in the twenty-two and one-half 13 year retirement program shall be irrevocable. 14 4. Each EMT member who becomes subject to the provisions of this arti- 15 cle on or after the starting date of the twenty-two and one-half year 16 retirement program shall become a participant in the twenty-two and 17 one-half year retirement program on the date such participant becomes an 18 EMT member. 19 5. Where any participant in the twenty-two and one-half year retire- 20 ment program shall cease to hold a position as an EMT member, they shall 21 cease to be such a participant and, during any period in which such 22 person does not hold such an EMT position, they shall not be a partic- 23 ipant in the twenty-two and one-half year retirement program and shall 24 not be eligible for the benefits of subdivision c of this section. 25 6. Where any participant in the twenty-two and one-half year retire- 26 ment program terminates service as an EMT member and returns to such 27 service as an EMT member at a later date, they shall again become such a 28 participant on that date. 29 7. Notwithstanding any other provision of the law to the contrary, any 30 person who is eligible to elect to become a participant in the twenty- 31 two and one-half year retirement program pursuant to paragraph one or 32 two of this subdivision for the full one hundred eighty day period 33 provided for in such applicable paragraph and who fails to timely file a 34 duly executed application for such participation with the retirement 35 system, shall not thereafter be eligible to become a participant in such 36 program. 37 c. Service retirement benefits. 1. A participant in the twenty-two and 38 one-half year retirement program: 39 (i) who has completed twenty-two and one-half or more years of credit- 40 able service as an EMT member; and 41 (ii) who has paid, before the effective date of retirement, all addi- 42 tional member contributions and interest, if any, required by subdivi- 43 sion e of this section; and 44 (iii) who files with the retirement system of which such participant 45 is a member an application for service retirement setting forth at what 46 time, not less than thirty days subsequent to the execution and filing 47 thereof, such participant desires to be retired; and 48 (iv) who shall be a participant in the twenty-two and one-year year 49 retirement program at the time so specified for such participant's 50 retirement; shall be retired pursuant to the provisions of this section 51 affording early service retirement. 52 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, and 53 subject to the provisions of paragraph six of subdivision e of this 54 section, the service retirement benefit for participants in the twenty- 55 two and one-half year retirement program who retire pursuant to para- A. 8444--A 15 1 graph one of this subdivision shall be a retirement allowance consisting 2 of: 3 (i) an amount, on account of the required minimum period of service, 4 equal to fifty percent of such participant's final average salary; plus 5 (ii) an amount on account of creditable service as an EMT member, or 6 fraction thereof, beyond such required minimum period of service equal 7 to two percent of their final salary as an EMT member during the period 8 from the completion of twenty-two and one-half years of creditable 9 service as an EMT member to the date of retirement but not to exceed 10 more than five years of additional service as an EMT member. 11 d. Vesting. 1. A participant in the twenty-two and one-half year 12 retirement program: 13 (i) who discontinues service as such a participant, other than by 14 death or retirement; and 15 (ii) who prior to such discontinuance, completed five but less than 16 twenty-two and one-half years of creditable service as an EMT member; 17 and 18 (iii) who, subject to the provisions of paragraph seven of subdivision 19 e of this section, has paid, prior to such discontinuance, all addi- 20 tional member contributions and interest, if any, required by subdivi- 21 sion e of this section; and 22 (iv) who does not withdraw in whole or in part their accumulated 23 member contributions pursuant to section six hundred thirteen of this 24 article unless such participant thereafter returns to public service and 25 repays the amounts so withdrawn, together with interest, pursuant to 26 such section six hundred thirteen shall be entitled to receive a 27 deferred vested benefit as provided in this subdivision. 28 2. (i) Upon such discontinuance under the conditions and in compliance 29 with the provisions of paragraph one of this subdivision, such deferred 30 vested benefit shall vest automatically. 31 (ii) In the case of a participant who is not a New York city revised 32 plan member, such vested benefit shall become payable on the earliest 33 date on which such discontinued member could have retired for service if 34 such discontinuance had not occurred, or, in the case of a participant 35 who is a New York city revised plan member, such vested benefit shall 36 become payable at age sixty-three. 37 3. Subject to the provisions of paragraph seven of subdivision e of 38 this section, such deferred vested benefit shall be a retirement allow- 39 ance consisting of an amount equal to two percent of such discontinued 40 member's final average salary, multiplied by the number of years of 41 creditable service as an EMT member. 42 e. Additional member contributions. 1. In addition to the member 43 contributions required by section six hundred thirteen of this article, 44 each participant in the twenty-two and one-half year retirement program 45 shall contribute to the retirement system of which they are a member, 46 subject to the applicable provisions of subdivision d of section six 47 hundred thirteen of this article, an additional six and one-half percent 48 of such participant's compensation earned from (i) all creditable 49 service, as a participant in the twenty-two and one-half year retirement 50 program, rendered on or after the starting date of the twenty-two and 51 one-half year retirement program, and (ii) all creditable service after 52 such person ceases to be a participant, but before such person again 53 becomes a participant pursuant to paragraph six of subdivision b of this 54 section. The additional contributions required by this section shall be 55 in lieu of additional member contributions required by subdivision d of 56 section six hundred four-c of this chapter as added by chapter ninety- A. 8444--A 16 1 six of the laws of nineteen hundred ninety-five, and shall be in lieu of 2 additional member contributions required by subdivision e of section six 3 hundred four-e of this chapter as added by chapter five hundred seven- 4 ty-seven of the laws of two thousand, and no member making additional 5 contributions pursuant to this section shall be required to make 6 contributions pursuant to such subdivision d of section six hundred 7 four-c of this article or such subdivision e of section six hundred 8 four-e of this article. 9 2. A participant in the twenty-two and one-half year retirement 10 program shall contribute additional member contributions until the later 11 of (i) the first anniversary of the starting date of the twenty-two and 12 one-half year retirement program, or (ii) the date on which such partic- 13 ipant completes twenty-seven and one-half years of credited service as 14 an EMT member. 15 3. Commencing with the first full payroll period after each person 16 becomes a participant in the twenty-two and one-half year retirement 17 program, additional member contributions at the rate specified in para- 18 graph one of this subdivision shall be deducted, subject to the applica- 19 ble provisions of subdivision d of section six hundred thirteen of this 20 article, from the compensation of such participant on each and every 21 payroll of such participant for each and every payroll period for which 22 they are such a participant. 23 4. (i) Each participant in the twenty-two and one-half year retirement 24 program shall be charged with a contribution deficiency consisting of 25 the total amounts of additional member contributions such person is 26 required to make pursuant to paragraphs one and two of this subdivision 27 which are not deducted from such person's compensation pursuant to para- 28 graph three of this subdivision, if any, together with interest thereon, 29 compounded annually, and computed in accordance with the provisions of 30 subparagraphs (ii) and (iii) of this paragraph. 31 (ii)(A) The interest required to be paid on each such amount specified 32 in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph shall accrue from the end of the 33 payroll period for which such amount would have been deducted from 34 compensation if such person had been a participant at the beginning of 35 that payroll period and such deduction had been required for such 36 payroll period, until such amount is paid to the retirement system. 37 (B) The rate of interest to be applied to each such amount during the 38 period for which interest accrues on that amount shall be equal to the 39 rate or rates of interest required by law to be used during that same 40 period to credit interest on the accumulated deductions of retirement 41 system members. 42 (iii) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph five of this subdivi- 43 sion, no interest shall be due on any unpaid additional member contrib- 44 utions which are not attributable to a period prior to the first full 45 payroll period referred to in paragraph three of this subdivision. 46 5. (i) Should any person who, pursuant to subparagraph (ii) of para- 47 graph ten of this subdivision, has received a refund of their additional 48 member contributions including any interest paid on such contributions, 49 again become a participant in the twenty-two and one-half year retire- 50 ment program pursuant to paragraph six of subdivision b of this section, 51 an appropriate amount shall be included in such participant's contrib- 52 ution deficiency, including interest thereon as calculated pursuant to 53 subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, for any credited service for which 54 such person received a refund of such additional member contributions, 55 including any amount of an unpaid loan balance deemed to have been A. 8444--A 17 1 returned to such person pursuant to paragraph twelve of this subdivi- 2 sion, as if such additional member contributions never had been paid. 3 (ii) (A) Interest on a participant's additional member contributions 4 included in such participant's contribution deficiency pursuant to 5 subparagraph (i) of this paragraph shall be calculated as if such addi- 6 tional member contributions had never been paid by such participant, and 7 such interest shall accrue from the end of the payroll period to which 8 an amount of such additional member contributions is attributable, until 9 such amount is paid to the retirement system. 10 (B) The rate of interest to be applied to such amount during the peri- 11 od for which interest accrues on that amount shall be five percent per 12 annum, compounded annually. 13 6. Where a participant who is otherwise eligible for service retire- 14 ment pursuant to subdivision c of this section did not, prior to the 15 effective date of retirement, pay the entire amount of a contribution 16 deficiency chargeable to such participant pursuant to paragraphs four 17 and five of this subdivision, or repay the entire amount of a loan of 18 their additional member contributions pursuant to paragraph eleven of 19 this subdivision, including accrued interest on such loan, that partic- 20 ipant, nevertheless, shall be eligible to retire pursuant to subdivision 21 c of this section, provided, however, that such participant's service 22 retirement benefit calculated pursuant to paragraph two of such subdivi- 23 sion c shall be reduced by a life annuity, calculated in accordance with 24 the method set forth in subdivision i of section six hundred thirteen-b 25 of this article, which is actuarially equivalent to: 26 (i) the amount of any unpaid contribution deficiency chargeable to 27 such member pursuant to paragraphs four and five of this subdivision; 28 plus 29 (ii) the amount of any unpaid balance of a loan of such participant's 30 additional member contributions pursuant to paragraph eleven of this 31 subdivision, including accrued interest on such loan. 32 7. Where a participant who is otherwise eligible for a vested right to 33 a deferred benefit pursuant to subdivision d of this section did not, 34 prior to the date of discontinuance of service, pay the entire amount of 35 a contribution deficiency chargeable to such participant pursuant to 36 paragraphs four and five of this subdivision, or repay the entire amount 37 of a loan of their additional member contributions pursuant to paragraph 38 eleven of this subdivision, including accrued interest on such loan, 39 that participant, nevertheless, shall have a vested right to a deferred 40 benefit pursuant to subdivision d of this section provided, however, 41 that the deferred vested benefit calculated pursuant to paragraph three 42 of subdivision d of this section shall be reduced by a life annuity, 43 calculated in accordance with the method set forth in subdivision i of 44 section six hundred thirteen-b of this article, which is actuarially 45 equivalent to: 46 (i) the amount of any unpaid contribution chargeable to such member 47 pursuant to paragraphs four and five of this subdivision; plus 48 (ii) the amount of any unpaid balance of a loan of their additional 49 member contributions pursuant to paragraph eleven of this subdivision, 50 including accrued interest on such loan. 51 8. The head of a retirement system which includes participants in the 52 twenty-two and one-half year retirement program in its membership may, 53 consistent with the provisions of this subdivision, promulgate regu- 54 lations for the payment of such additional member contributions, and any 55 interest thereon, by such participants, including the deduction of such A. 8444--A 18 1 contributions, and any interest thereon, from the participant's compen- 2 sation. 3 9. Subject to the provisions of paragraphs six and seven of this 4 subdivision, where a participant has not paid in full any contribution 5 deficiency chargeable to such participant pursuant to paragraphs four 6 and five of this subdivision, and a benefit, other than a refund of 7 member contributions pursuant to section six hundred thirteen of this 8 article or a refund of additional member contributions pursuant to 9 subparagraph (ii) of paragraph ten of this subdivision, becomes payable 10 under this article to the participant or to their designated beneficiary 11 or estate, the actuarial equivalent of any such unpaid amount shall be 12 deducted from the benefit otherwise payable. 13 10. (i) Such additional member contributions, and any interest there- 14 on, shall be paid into the contingent reserve fund of the retirement 15 system of which the participant is a member and shall not for any 16 purpose be deemed to be member contributions or accumulated contrib- 17 utions of a member under section six hundred thirteen of this article or 18 otherwise while they are a participant in the twenty-two and one-half 19 year retirement program or otherwise. 20 (ii) Should a participant in the twenty-two and one-half year retire- 21 ment program who has rendered less than fifteen years of credited 22 service cease to hold a position as an EMT member for any reason whatso- 23 ever, such participant's accumulated additional member contributions 24 made pursuant to this subdivision, together with any interest thereon 25 paid to the retirement system, may be withdrawn by such participant 26 pursuant to procedures promulgated in regulations of the board of trus- 27 tees of the retirement system, together with interest thereon at the 28 rate of five percent per annum, compounded annually. 29 (iii) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, (A) 30 no person shall be permitted to withdraw from the retirement system any 31 additional member contributions paid pursuant to this subdivision or any 32 interest paid thereon, except pursuant to and in accordance with the 33 preceding subparagraphs of this paragraph; and (B) no person, while they 34 are a participant in the twenty-two and one-half year retirement 35 program, shall be permitted to withdraw any such additional member 36 contributions or any interest paid thereon pursuant to any of the 37 preceding subparagraphs of this paragraph or otherwise. 38 11. A participant in the twenty-two and one-half year retirement 39 program shall be permitted to borrow from their additional member 40 contributions, including any interest paid thereon, which are credited 41 to the additional contributions account established for such participant 42 in the contingent reserve fund of the retirement system. The borrowing 43 from such additional member contributions pursuant to this paragraph 44 shall be governed by the rights, privileges, obligations and procedures 45 set forth in section six hundred thirteen-b of this article which govern 46 the borrowing of member contributions made pursuant to section six 47 hundred thirteen of this article. The board of trustees of the retire- 48 ment system may, consistent with the provisions of this subdivision and 49 the provisions of section six hundred thirteen-b of this article as made 50 applicable to this subdivision, promulgate regulations governing the 51 borrowing of such additional member contributions. 52 12. Whenever a person has an unpaid balance of a loan or such person's 53 additional member contributions pursuant to paragraph eleven of this 54 subdivision at the time they become entitled to a refund of their addi- 55 tional member contributions pursuant to subparagraph (ii) of paragraph 56 ten of this subdivision, the amount of such unpaid loan balance, includ- A. 8444--A 19 1 ing accrued interest shall be deemed to have been returned to such 2 member, and the refund of such additional contributions shall be the net 3 amount of such contribution, together with interest thereon in accord- 4 ance with the provisions of such subparagraph (ii). 5 f. Cost-of-living adjustments. Notwithstanding any other provision of 6 law to the contrary, a person who retires with a retirement benefit 7 provided for in the twenty-two and one-half year retirement program 8 pursuant to the provisions of this section shall not be entitled to the 9 cost-of-living adjustments provided pursuant to section 13-696 of the 10 administrative code of the city of New York. 11 § 7. Paragraph 7 of subdivision d of section 613 of the retirement and 12 social security law, as added by chapter 577 of the laws of 2000, is 13 amended to read as follows: 14 7. (i) The city of New York shall, in the case of an EMT member (as 15 defined in paragraph one of subdivision a of section six hundred four-e 16 of this article) who is a participant in the twenty-five year retirement 17 program (as defined in paragraph four of subdivision a of such section 18 six hundred four-e), and in the case of an EMT member (as defined in 19 paragraph one of subdivision a of section six hundred four-k of this 20 article) who is a participant in the twenty-two and one-half year 21 retirement program (as defined in paragraph four of subdivision a of 22 such section six hundred four-k), and who is not rendered ineligible for 23 such pick ups by another provision of law, pick up and pay to the 24 retirement system of which such participant is a member all additional 25 member contributions which otherwise would be required to be deducted 26 from such member's compensation pursuant to paragraphs one and two of 27 subdivision e of [such] section six hundred four-e of this article, or 28 pursuant to paragraphs one and two of subdivision e of section six 29 hundred four-k of this article, (not including any additional member 30 contributions due for any period prior to the first full payroll period 31 referred to in such paragraph three of such subdivision e), and shall 32 effect such pick up on each and every payroll of such participant for 33 each and every payroll period with respect to which such paragraph three 34 would otherwise require such deductions. 35 (ii) An amount equal to the amount of additional contributions picked 36 up pursuant to this paragraph shall be deducted by such employer from 37 the compensation of such member (as such compensation would be in the 38 absence of a pick up program applicable to [him or her] such member 39 hereunder) and shall not be paid to such member. 40 (iii) The additional member contributions picked up pursuant to this 41 paragraph for any such member shall be paid by such employer in lieu of 42 an equal amount of additional member contributions otherwise required to 43 be paid by such member under the applicable provisions of subdivision e 44 of section six hundred four-e of this article, and shall be deemed to be 45 and treated as employer contributions pursuant to section 414(h) of the 46 Internal Revenue Code. 47 (iv) For the purpose of determining the retirement system rights, 48 benefits and privileges of any member whose additional member contrib- 49 utions are picked up pursuant to this paragraph, such picked up addi- 50 tional member contributions shall be deemed to be and treated as part of 51 such member's additional member contributions under the applicable 52 provisions of subdivision e of section six hundred four-e and subdivi- 53 sion e of section six hundred four-k of this article. 54 (v) With the exception of federal income tax treatment, the additional 55 member contributions picked up pursuant to subparagraph (i) of this 56 paragraph shall for all other purposes, including computation of retire- A. 8444--A 20 1 ment benefits and contributions by employers and employees, be deemed 2 employee salary. Nothing contained in this subdivision shall be 3 construed as superseding the provisions of section four hundred thirty- 4 one of this chapter, or any similar provision of law which limits the 5 salary base for computing retirement benefits payable by a public 6 retirement system. 7 § 8. Section 13-125.2 of the administrative code of the city of New 8 York is amended by adding two new subdivisions a-9 and a-10 to read as 9 follows: 10 a-9. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, on or 11 after the starting date for pick up, the employer responsible for pick 12 up shall, in the case of an EMT member, as defined in paragraph one of 13 subdivision a of section 13-157.5 of this chapter, who is a participant 14 in the twenty-two and one-half year retirement program, as defined in 15 paragraph two of such subdivision a, pick up and pay to the retirement 16 system all additional member contributions which otherwise would be 17 required to be deducted from such member's compensation pursuant to 18 subdivision e of such section 13-157.5, and shall effect such pick up on 19 each and every payroll of such participant for each and every payroll 20 period with respect to which such subdivision e would otherwise require 21 such deductions. 22 a-10. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, on 23 or after the starting date for pick up, the employer responsible for 24 pick up shall, in the case of an EMT member, as defined in paragraph two 25 of subdivision a of section four hundred forty-five-j of the retirement 26 and social security law, who is a participant in the twenty-two and 27 one-half year retirement program, as defined in paragraph three of such 28 subdivision a, pick up and pay to the retirement system all additional 29 member contributions which otherwise would be required to be deducted 30 from such member's compensation pursuant to subdivision d of such 31 section four hundred forty-five-j, and shall effect such pick up on each 32 and every payroll of such participant for each and every payroll period 33 with respect to which such subdivision d would otherwise require such 34 deductions. 35 § 9. Subparagraph (ii) of paragraph 1 of subdivision c of section 36 13-125.2 of the administrative code of the city of New York, as amended 37 by chapter 682 of the laws of 2003, is amended to read as follows: 38 (ii) the determination of the amount of such member's Tier I or Tier 39 II nonuniformed-force member contributions eligible for pick up by the 40 employer or additional member contributions required to be picked up 41 pursuant to subdivision a-one, subdivision a-two, subdivision a-three, 42 subdivision a-four, subdivision a-five, subdivision a-six, subdivision 43 a-seven [or], subdivision a-eight, subdivision a-nine, or subdivision 44 a-ten of this section; and 45 § 10. Subdivision d of section 13-125.2 of the administrative code of 46 the city of New York is amended by adding two new paragraphs 2-h and 2-i 47 to read as follows: 48 (2-h) For the purpose of determining the retirement system rights, 49 benefits and privileges of any member who is a participant in the twen- 50 ty-two and one-half year retirement program, as defined in paragraph two 51 of subdivision a of section 13-157.5 of this chapter, the additional 52 member contributions of such participant picked up pursuant to subdivi- 53 sion a-nine of this section shall be deemed to be and treated as a part 54 of such member's additional contributions under subdivision e of such 55 section 13-157.5. A. 8444--A 21 1 (2-i) For the purpose of determining the retirement system rights, 2 benefits and privileges of any member who is a participant in the twen- 3 ty-two and one-half year retirement program, as defined in paragraph 4 three of subdivision a of section four hundred forty-five-j of the 5 retirement and social security law, the additional member contributions 6 of such participant picked up pursuant to subdivision a-ten of this 7 section shall be deemed to be and treated as a part of such member's 8 additional member contributions under subdivision d of section four 9 hundred forty-five-j of the retirement and social security law. 10 § 11. Paragraph 3 of subdivision d of section 13-125.2 of the adminis- 11 trative code of the city of New York, as amended by chapter 682 of the 12 laws of 2003, is amended to read as follows: 13 (3) Interest on contributions picked up for any Tier I or Tier II 14 non-uniformed-force member pursuant to this section (other than addi- 15 tional member contributions picked up pursuant to subdivision a-one, 16 subdivision a-two, subdivision a-three, subdivision a-four, subdivision 17 a-five, subdivision a-six, subdivision a-seven [or], subdivision 18 a-eight, subdivision a-nine, or subdivision a-ten of this section) shall 19 accrue in favor of the member and be payable to the retirement system at 20 the same rate, for the same time periods, in the same manner and under 21 the same circumstances as interest would be required to accrue in favor 22 of the member and be payable to the retirement system on such contrib- 23 utions if they were made by such member in the absence of a pick up 24 program applicable to such member under the provisions of this section. 25 § 12. Subdivision a of section 603 of the retirement and social secu- 26 rity law, as amended by section 3 of part EE of chapter 55 of the laws 27 of 2024, is amended to read as follows: 28 a. The service retirement benefit specified in section six hundred 29 four of this article shall be payable to members who have met the mini- 30 mum service requirements upon retirement and attainment of age sixty- 31 two, other than members who are eligible for early service retirement 32 pursuant to subdivision c of section six hundred four-b of this article, 33 subdivision c of section six hundred four-c of this article, subdivision 34 d of section six hundred four-d of this article, subdivision c of 35 section six hundred four-e of this article, subdivision c of section six 36 hundred four-f of this article, subdivision c of section six hundred 37 four-g of this article, subdivision c of section six hundred four-h of 38 this article subdivision c of section six hundred four-i of this arti- 39 cle, [or] subdivision c of section six hundred four-j of this article, 40 or subdivision c of section six hundred four-k of this article, 41 provided, however, a member of a teachers' retirement system or the New 42 York state and local employees' retirement system who first joins such 43 system before January first, two thousand ten or a member who is a 44 uniformed court officer or peace officer employed by the unified court 45 system who first becomes a member of the New York state and local 46 employees' retirement system before April first, two thousand twelve may 47 retire without reduction of their retirement benefit upon attainment of 48 at least fifty-five years of age and completion of thirty or more years 49 of service, provided, however, that a uniformed court officer or peace 50 officer employed by the unified court system who first becomes a member 51 of the New York state and local employees' retirement system on or after 52 January first, two thousand ten and retires without reduction of their 53 retirement benefit upon attainment of at least fifty-five years of age 54 and completion of thirty or more years of service pursuant to this 55 section shall be required to make the member contributions required by 56 subdivision f of section six hundred thirteen of this article for all A. 8444--A 22 1 years of credited and creditable service, provided further that the 2 preceding provisions of this subdivision shall not apply to a New York 3 city revised plan member. 4 § 13. Subdivision d of section 613 of the retirement and social secu- 5 rity law is amended by adding a new paragraph 13 to read as follows: 6 13. (i) The city of New York shall, in the case of an EMT member, as 7 defined in paragraph one of subdivision a of section six hundred four-k 8 of this article, who is a participant in the twenty-two and one-half 9 year retirement program, as defined in paragraph four of subdivision a 10 of such section six hundred four-k, pick up and pay to the retirement 11 system of which such participant is a member all additional member 12 contributions which otherwise would be required to be deducted from such 13 member's compensation pursuant to paragraphs one and two of subdivision 14 e of such section six hundred four-k, not including any additional 15 member contributions due for any period prior to the first full payroll 16 period referred to in such paragraph three of such subdivision e, and 17 shall effect such pick up on each and every payroll of such participant 18 for each and every payroll period with respect to which such paragraph 19 three would otherwise require such deductions. 20 (ii) An amount equal to the amount of additional contributions picked 21 up pursuant to this paragraph shall be deducted by such employer from 22 the compensation of such member, as such compensation would be in the 23 absence of a pick up program applicable to such member hereunder, and 24 shall not be paid to such member. 25 (iii) The additional member contributions picked up pursuant to this 26 paragraph for any such member shall be paid by such employer in lieu of 27 an equal amount of additional member contributions otherwise required to 28 be paid by such member under the applicable provisions of subdivision e 29 of section six hundred four-k of this article, and shall be deemed to be 30 and treated as employer contributions pursuant to section 414(h) of the 31 Internal Revenue Code. 32 (iv) For the purpose of determining the retirement system rights, 33 benefits and privileges of any member whose additional member contrib- 34 utions are picked up pursuant to this paragraph, such picked up addi- 35 tional member contributions shall be deemed to be and treated as part of 36 such member's additional member contributions under the applicable 37 provisions of subdivision e of section six hundred four-k of this arti- 38 cle. 39 (v) With the exception of federal income tax treatment, the additional 40 member contributions picked up pursuant to subparagraph (i) of this 41 paragraph shall for all other purposes, including computation of retire- 42 ment benefits and contributions by employers and employees, be deemed 43 employee salary. Nothing contained in this subdivision shall be 44 construed as superseding the provisions of section four hundred thirty- 45 one of this chapter, or any similar provision of law which limits the 46 salary base for computing retirement benefits payable in New York by a 47 public retirement system. 48 § 14. Nothing contained in sections seven and twelve of this act shall 49 be construed to create any contractual right with respect to members to 50 whom such sections apply. The provisions of such sections are intended 51 to afford members the advantages of certain benefits contained in the 52 internal revenue code, and the effectiveness and existence of such 53 sections and benefits they confer are completely contingent thereon. 54 § 15. This act shall take effect immediately, provided, however that: 55 (a) The provisions of sections seven, twelve and thirteen of this act 56 shall remain in force and effect only so long as, pursuant to federal A. 8444--A 23 1 law, contributions picked up under such sections are not includable as 2 gross income of a member for federal income tax purposes until distrib- 3 uted or made available to the member; provided that the New York city 4 employees' retirement system shall notify the legislative bill drafting 5 commission upon the occurrence of such a change in federal law ruling 6 affecting the provisions of this act in order that the commission may 7 maintain an accurate and timely effective data base of the official text 8 of the laws of the state of New York in furtherance of effectuating the 9 provisions of section 44 of the legislative law and section 70-b of the 10 public officers law; 11 (b) The amendments to subdivision d of section 613 of the retirement 12 and social security law made by sections seven and thirteen of this act 13 shall not affect the expiration of such subdivision and shall expire 14 therewith; 15 (c) The amendments to section 13-125.2 of the administrative code of 16 the city of New York made by sections eight, nine, ten and eleven of 17 this act shall not affect the expiration of such section and shall be 18 deemed to expire therewith; and 19 (d) The amendments to subdivision a of section 603 of the retirement 20 and social security law made by section twelve of this act shall not 21 affect the expiration of such subdivision and shall be deemed to expire 22 therewith. FISCAL NOTE.--Pursuant to Legislative Law, Section 50: SUMMARY: This proposed legislation would establish 22.5-Year Retire- ment Programs within the New York City Employees Retirement System (NYCERS) for New York City Emergency Medical Technicians (EMT). EXPECTED INCREASE (DECREASE) IN EMPLOYER CONTRIBUTIONS by Fiscal Year for the first 25 years ($ in Millions) Year NYCERS 2027 31.3 2028 31.1 2029 31.0 2030 30.9 2031 30.7 2032 30.5 2033 30.3 2034 30.2 2035 30.0 2036 29.8 2037 29.5 2038 29.4 2039 9.3 2040 9.2 2041 9.1 2042 8.9 2043 8.7 2044 8.5 2045 8.3 2046 8.1 2047 7.9 2048 7.7 2049 7.7 2050 7.8 2051 8.0 A. 8444--A 24 Projected contributions include future new hires that may be impacted. For Fiscal Year 2052 and beyond, the expected increase in normal cost as a level percent of pay for impacted new entrants is approximately 1.16%. The entire increase in employer contributions will be allocated to New York City. PRESENT VALUE OF BENEFITS: The Present Value of Benefits is the discounted expected value of benefits paid to current members if all assumptions are met, including future service accrual and pay increases. Future new hires are not included in this present value. INITIAL INCREASE (DECREASE) IN ACTUARIAL PRESENT VALUES as of June 30, 2025 ($ in Millions) Present Value (PV) NYCERS (1) PV of Employer Contributions: 240.6 (2) PV of Employee Contributions: (56.0) Total PV of Benefits (1) + (2): 184.6 UNFUNDED ACCRUED LIABILITY (UAL): Actuarial Accrued Liabilities are the portion of the Present Value of Benefits allocated to past service. Changes in UAL were amortized over the expected remaining working life- time of those impacted using level dollar payments. AMORTIZATION OF UNFUNDED ACCRUED LIABILITY NYCERS Increase (Decrease) in UAL: 153.3 M Number of Payments: 12 Amortization Payment: 20.0 M CENSUS DATA: The estimates presented herein are based on preliminary census data collected as of June 30, 2025. The census data for the impacted population is summarized below. NYCERS Active Members - Number Count: 3,750 - Average Age: 36.4 - Average Service: 9.5 - Average Salary: 77,000 IMPACT ON MEMBER BENEFITS AND CONTRIBUTIONS: The proposed legislation would provide a service retirement benefit equal to: * 50% of Final Average Salary (FAS) for the first 22.5 years of cred- itable service as an EMT member, * plus 2.0% of FAS for each additional year of creditable service as an EMT member exceeding 22.5 years to a maximum of 5 years. The vested benefit under the EMT 22.5-Year Plans is equal to 2.0% of FAS for each year of creditable service as an EMT member up to 22.5 years, payable to Tier 6 members at age 63 and to Tier 4 members on the date they would have attained 22.5 years of creditable service. The retirement benefits provided by the EMT 22.5-Year Plan would not be subject to cost-of-living adjustments (COLA). Plan participants would be required to pay Additional Member Contrib- utions (AMC) equal to 6.5% of compensation for all service on and after the starting date of the Plan until the later of the one-year anniver- A. 8444--A 25 sary of the effective date of the Plan or 27.5 years of creditable service as an EMT member. Current Tier 4 and Tier 6 EMT members as of the date of enactment of the EMT 22.5-Year Plans would be eligible to elect the EMT 22.5-Year Plan for their respective tier. EMT members who become NYCERS members after the date of enactment of the EMT 22.5-Year Plans would be mandated into the Tier 6 EMT 22.5-Year Plan. Once a member in the Tier 4 EMT 22.5-Year Plan attains 22.5 years of creditable service as an EMT member, he or she would no longer be eligi- ble to retire under his or her basic plan. ASSUMPTIONS AND METHODS: The estimates presented herein have been calculated based on the Revised 2021 Actuarial Assumptions and Methods of the impacted retirement systems. In addition: * New entrants were assumed to replace exiting members so that total payroll increases by 3% each year for impacted groups. New entrant demo- graphics were developed based on data for recent new hires and actuarial judgement. To determine the impact of the elective nature of the proposed legis- lation, a subgroup of EMT members was developed based on who is assumed to benefit actuarially by comparing the net present value of future employer costs of each member's benefit under their current plan and under the EMT 22.5-Year Plan. RISK AND UNCERTAINTY: The costs presented in this Fiscal Note depend highly on the actuarial assumptions, methods, and models used, demo- graphics of the impacted population, and other factors such as invest- ment, contribution, and other risks. If actual experience deviates from actuarial assumptions, the actual costs could differ from those presented herein. Quantifying these risks is beyond the scope of this Fiscal Note. This Fiscal Note is intended to measure pension-related impacts and does not include other potential costs (e.g., administrative and Other Postemployment Benefits). This Fiscal Note does not reflect any chapter laws that may have been enacted during the current legislative session. STATEMENT OF ACTUARIAL OPINION: Marek Tyszkiewicz and Gregory Zelikov- sky are members of the Society of Actuaries and the American Academy of Actuaries. We are members of NYCERS, but do not believe it impairs our objectivity, and we meet the Qualification Standards of the American Academy of Actuaries to render the actuarial opinion contained herein. To the best of our knowledge, the results contained herein have been prepared in accordance with generally accepted actuarial principles and procedures and with the Actuarial Standards of Practice issued by the Actuarial Standards Board. FISCAL NOTE IDENTIFICATION: This Fiscal Note 2026-57 dated April 3, 2026 was prepared by the Chief Actuary for the New York City Retirement Systems and Pension Funds and is intended for use only during the 2026 Legislative Session.